District of Columbia statutes.
25-373

Transfer of ownership of establishments which permit nude dancing.

A licensee under § 25-371(b) may transfer ownership in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959